California statutes. Insurance Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 577, Sec. 6.   (SB 1182)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10181.11.

(a) Whenever it appears to the department that any person has engaged, or is about to engage, in any act or practice constituting a violation of this article, including the filing of inaccurate or unjustified rates or inaccurate or unjustified rate information, the department may review rate filing to ensure compliance with the law.

(b) The department may review other filings.

(c) The department shall accept and post to its Internet Web site any public comment on a rate increase submitted to the department during the applicable period described in subdivision (d) of Section 10181.7.

(d) The
 department shall report to the Legislature at least quarterly on all unreasonable rate filings.

(e) The department shall post on its Internet Web site any changes submitted by the insurer to the proposed rate increase, including any documentation submitted by the insurer supporting those changes.

(f) If the commissioner makes a decision that an unreasonable rate increase is not justified or that a rate filing contains inaccurate information, the department shall post that decision on its Internet Web site.

(g) Nothing in this article shall be construed to impair or impede the department’s authority to administer or enforce any other provision of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 498, Sec. 9.   (SB 908)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10181.13.

The department shall do all of the following in a manner consistent with applicable federal laws, rules, and regulations:

(a) Provide data to the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services on health insurer rate trends in premium rating areas.

(b) Commencing with the creation of the Exchange, provide to the Exchange such information as may be necessary to allow compliance with federal law, rules, regulations, and guidance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 661, Sec. 7.   (SB 1163)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10181.14.

(a) This section shall apply only to a specialized health insurance policy covering dental services, as defined in Section 10120.41.

(b) On or after January 1, 2025, and at least annually thereafter, a
 health insurer shall file with the department the information required by this article, as applicable, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Type of insurer involved, such as for profit or not for profit.

(2) Product type.

(3) Whether the products are opened or closed.

(4) Annual rate.

(5) Total earned premiums in
 each policy form.

(6) Total incurred claims in each policy form.

(7) Review category: initial filing for new product, filing for existing product, or resubmission.

(8) Average rate of increase.

(9) Effective date of rate increase.

(10) Number of policyholders or insureds affected by each policy form.

(11) A comparison of claims cost and rate changes over time.

(12) Any changes in insured cost sharing over the prior year associated with the submitted rate filing.

(13) Any changes in insured benefits over the prior year associated with the submitted rate filing.

(14) Any changes in administrative costs.

(15) Variation in trend, by geographic region, if the insurer serves more than one geographic region.

(16) The loss ratio for the policy as described in Section 10112.26 and the lifetime loss ratio as described in the regulations adopted pursuant to Section 10293.

(17) Proposed and effective rates for all products.

(18) A rating manual that outlines the methodology used in the development of the premium
 rates, along with a description of how rates were determined.

(19) The base rate or rates and the factors used to determine the base rate or rates.

(20) Trend, including overall average, and by-product, if different.

(21) Any other factors affecting dental premium rates.

(22) An actuarial certification signed by a qualified actuary.

(23) Any other information required for the department to make its determination.

(c) (1) The
 health insurer shall file with the department the required information at least 120 days before any change in the methodology, factors, or assumptions that would affect rates.

(2) A health insurer shall respond to the department’s request for any additional information necessary for the department to complete its review of the health insurer’s rate filing for individual and group health insurance policies within five business days of the department’s request or as otherwise required by the department.

(3) If a health insurer fails to provide all the information the department requires in order for the department to make its determination, the
 department may determine that a health insurer’s rate change is unreasonable or not justified.

(4) If the department determines that a health insurer’s rate change for individual or group health insurance policies is unreasonable or not justified consistent with this article, the health insurer shall provide notice of that determination to an individual or group applicant or policyholder.

(5) The department may contract with a consultant or consultants with expertise to assist the department in its review. Contracts entered into pursuant to the authority in this article shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code, and the State Contract Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code).

(d) For all health insurers covering dental services, the department shall issue a determination that the health insurer’s rate change is unreasonable or not justified no later than 60 days following receipt of all the information the department requires to make its determination. The determination by the department shall also apply to the methodology, factors, and assumptions used to determine rates.

(e) The department may review the rate filings to ensure compliance with the law, as described in Section 10181.11, excluding subdivision (c).

(f) The department may require all
 health insurers to submit all rate filings to the National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ System for Electronic Rate and Form Filing (SERFF). Submission of the required rate filings to SERFF shall be deemed to be filing with the department for purposes of compliance with this section.

(g) (1) The department may adopt emergency regulations implementing this section. The initial adoption of emergency regulations implementing this section and the readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this subdivision shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(2) On or before July 1, 2024, the commissioner may issue guidance to health insurers regarding compliance
 with this section. This guidance shall not be subject to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(3) The department shall consult with the Department of Managed Health Care when issuing guidance on adopting necessary regulations pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 557, Sec. 6.   (AB 1048)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Exemptions and Miscellaneous Provisions Relating to Insurance Contracts [10190. - 10192.]

10190.

The provisions of Sections 800, 801, 802, 803, and 804 shall not apply to life insurance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 189.)
-------------------------------------------

10191.

(a) The commissioner may, from time to time as conditions warrant, after notice and hearing, promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations, and amendments and additions thereto, as are necessary or advisable, to establish and maintain a procedure for the filing and approval of documents, as defined in this section, prior to their issuance, delivery, or use in this state, in lieu of the requirements of submission, filing, or approval for the documents presently provided in Section 10205, 10205.5, 10205.6, 10225, 10270, 10270.1, 10270.57, 10270.9, 10270.91, 10270.92, 10270.93, 10290, 10292, 11066, 11069, 11513, 11513.1, 11513.2, 11515, or 11658. For purposes of this section, “document” includes, but is not limited to, every form of contract, insurance policy, application, rider, endorsement, amendment, insert policy page, certificate, or other evidence or notice of insurance, fill-in material, schedules of rates and classifications of risks, and any modification to any document, which is subject to the requirements of any of the enumerated sections.

(b) Any such rule or regulation shall be promulgated in accordance with the procedure provided in Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) In promulgating any such rule or regulation, the commissioner may give consideration to the following circumstances:

(1) Whether all such documents, the submission, filing, or approval of which is governed by any of the foregoing enumerated sections, or only a portion thereof described in the rule or regulation, shall be subject thereto.

(2) Whether certain documents or portions thereof should be regulated in respect of submission, filing, or approval in a fashion differing from similar requirements applicable to other documents.

(3) Whether varying procedures may be made applicable among admitted insurers in respect of the submission, filing or approval predicated, in whole or in part, upon such factors as the age and size of the submitting insurer, the period of its licensing in this state for the class or classes of insurance represented by the documents, the nature and number of prior submissions of similar documents and the disposition thereof by the commissioner, and similar criteria which is relevant to a determination that the submitting insurer has demonstrated compliance with all applicable statutes, rules, and regulations relating to documents comprising prior submissions.

(d) In promulgating any such rules and regulations, the commissioner shall, so far as practical, describe or define certain provisions: (1) which the commissioner will authorize without review when accompanied by a certification prescribed by him or her by rule, and (2) which the commissioner will under no circumstances approve.

(e) The commissioner shall establish a period of time, not shorter than one year, during which any change in the provisions which pursuant to subdivision (d), he or she has provided he or she will under no circumstances approve, will not apply to policies filed prior to the effective date of the change.

(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section any document approved by the commissioner pursuant to rules and regulations authorized by this section may have its approval withdrawn in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 10291.5 or Section 12957, whichever is applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 95.)
-------------------------------------------

10191.1.

(a) In order to streamline the department’s file review process for life and disability insurance forms, the commissioner may develop and publish all of the following:

(1) Procedural requirements for file submission.

(2) Guidelines and checklists that list and interpret applicable required and optional insurance statutes and regulations.

(3) Standard insurance contract language previously approved by the department.

(b) Documented use of the published standards described in paragraphs
 (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) will enable the
 department to expedite its review process. In order to expedite file review, an expanded cover letter, in a format published by the department, shall be used to clearly document and demonstrate compliance with those standards.

(c) A publication developed pursuant to this section shall be made available on a dedicated page of the department’s Internet Web site.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 691, Sec. 1.   (AB 387)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10191.5.

(a) (1) The commissioner shall request that a multistate regulatory support organization commission a
 study to examine and report on the extent to which the uniform standards set forth in the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact developed by the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Commission provide consumer protections that are equivalent to those established under state law for annuity, life, disability income, and long-term care insurance products.

(2) The
 commissioner’s request for the study described in paragraph (1) shall include a request that the study be completed no later than January 1, 2017, and that the study, to the extent feasible, highlight the substantive differences between the uniform standards set forth in the Interstate Insurance Product Regulation Compact and the statutory requirements under state law for annuity, life, disability income, and long-term care insurance products.

(b) (1) Upon
 completion of the study described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the commissioner shall submit the study to the Chairpersons of the Assembly and Senate committees on insurance. The study shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) The commissioner may review the final
 study prior to its submission to the Legislature, and submit written comments on the results of the study to the Legislature when submitting the study to the Legislature pursuant to paragraph (1).

(c) No
 moneys from the General Fund or the Insurance Fund may be used to implement this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 691, Sec. 2.   (AB 387)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.

If a policy of life insurance becomes paid up pursuant to a paid up nonforfeiture benefit, the insurer shall send a notice to the owner of the policy not later than six months after the date the paid up nonforfeiture benefit becomes effective, and once every five years thereafter. The notice shall advise the owner of the policy that the owner, within six months after the date of the notice, may request the insurer to send notices to all direct beneficiaries named in the policy. If so requested, the insurer shall send the notices by first-class mail to the addresses of the beneficiaries as supplied by the owner. The notices shall advise the beneficiaries that they are named as beneficiaries in the policy, and shall identify the owner of the policy and the insured. The insurer shall provide, but not be limited to, the following information upon request from the beneficiary: (a) how the policy of insurance is identified on the records of the insurer, (b) the amount of death benefits, and (c) the cash surrender value of the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 870, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Medicare Supplement Policies [10192.1. - 10192.24.]

10192.1.

All Medicare supplement policies and certificates shall comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 10291.5 and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10600) of Part 2 of Division 2, regardless of the situs of the contract.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.2.

The purpose of this article is to provide for the reasonable standardization of coverage and simplification of terms and benefits of Medicare supplement policies, to facilitate public understanding and comparison of those policies, to eliminate provisions contained in those policies that may be misleading or confusing in connection with the purchase of the policies or with the settlement of claims, and to provide for full disclosures in the sale of Medicare supplement insurance policies to persons eligible for Medicare.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section or in Sections 10192.7, 10192.12, 10192.13, 10192.16, and 10192.21, this article shall apply to all Medicare supplement policies advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery in this state on or after January 1, 2001, and to all certificates delivered in this state under a group Medicare supplement master policy agreement that have been advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery in this state on or after that date.

(b) This
 article shall not apply to a policy or contract of one or more employers or labor organizations, or of the trustees of a fund established by one or more employers or labor organizations, or combination thereof, for employees or former employees, or a combination thereof, or for members or former members, or a combination thereof, of the labor organizations.

(c) This article shall not apply to Medicare supplement policies subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1358.1) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) The commissioner may, from time to time, promulgate regulations to implement this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.4.

The following definitions apply for the purposes of this article:

(a) “Applicant” means:

(1) The person who seeks to contract for insurance benefits, in the case of an individual Medicare supplement policy.

(2) The proposed
 certificate holder, in the case of a group Medicare supplement policy.

(b) “Bankruptcy” means that situation in which a Medicare Advantage organization that is not an issuer has filed, or has had filed against it, a petition for declaration of bankruptcy and has ceased doing business in the state.

(c) “Certificate” means a certificate issued for delivery in this state under a group Medicare supplement policy.

(d) “Certificate form” means the form on which the certificate is issued for delivery by the issuer.

(e) “Continuous period of creditable coverage” means the period during which an individual was covered by creditable coverage, if during the period of the coverage the individual had no breaks in coverage greater than 63 days.

(f) (1) “Creditable coverage” means, with respect to an individual, coverage of the individual provided under any of the following:

(A) Any individual or group contract, policy, certificate, or program that is written or administered by a health care service plan, health insurer, fraternal benefits society, self-insured employer plan, or any other entity, in this state or elsewhere, and that arranges or provides medical, hospital, and surgical coverage not designed to supplement other private or governmental plans. The term includes continuation or conversion coverage.

(B) Part A or B of Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.) (Medicare).

(C) Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 1396 et seq.) (Medicaid (known as Medi-Cal in California)), other than coverage consisting solely of benefits under Section 1928 of that act.

(D) Chapter 55 of Title 10 of the United States Code (CHAMPUS).

(E) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization.

(F) A state health benefits risk pool.

(G) A health plan offered under Chapter 89 of Title 5 of the United States Code (Federal Employees Health Benefits Program).

(H) A public health plan as defined in federal regulations authorized by Section 2701(c)(1)(I) of the federal Public Health Service Act, as amended by Public Law 104-191, the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of
 1996.

(I) A health benefit plan under Section 5(e) of the federal Peace Corps Act (Section 2504(e) of Title 22 of the United States Code).

(J) Any other publicly sponsored program, provided in this state or elsewhere, of medical, hospital, and surgical care.

(K) Any other creditable coverage as defined by subsection (c) of Section 2701 of Title XXVII of the federal Public Health Service Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 300gg(c)).

(2) “Creditable coverage” shall not include one or more, or any combination of, the following:

(A) Coverage only for accident or disability income insurance, or any combination thereof.

(B) Coverage issued as a
 supplement to liability insurance.

(C) Liability insurance, including general liability insurance and automobile liability insurance.

(D) Workers’ compensation or similar insurance.

(E) Automobile medical payment insurance.

(F) Credit-only insurance.

(G) Coverage for onsite medical clinics.

(H) Other similar insurance coverage, specified in federal regulations, under which benefits for medical care are secondary or incidental to other insurance benefits.

(3) “Creditable coverage” shall not include the following benefits if they are provided under a separate
 policy, certificate, or contract of insurance or are otherwise not an integral part of the plan:

(A) Limited scope dental or vision benefits.

(B) Benefits for long-term care, nursing home care, home health care, community-based care, or any combination thereof.

(C) Other similar, limited benefits as are specified in federal regulations.

(4) “Creditable coverage” shall not include the following benefits if offered as independent, noncoordinated benefits:

(A) Coverage only for a specified disease or illness.

(B) Hospital indemnity or other fixed indemnity insurance.

(5) “Creditable coverage” shall not include the following if offered as a separate policy, certificate, or contract of insurance:

(A) Medicare supplemental health insurance as defined under Section 1882(g)(1) of the federal Social Security Act.

(B) Coverage supplemental to the coverage provided under Chapter 55 of Title 10 of the United States Code.

(C) Similar supplemental coverage provided to coverage under a group health plan.

(g) “Employee welfare benefit plan” means a plan, fund, or program of employee benefits as defined in Section 1002 of Title 29 of the United States Code (Employee Retirement Income Security Act).

(h) “Insolvency” means when an issuer, licensed to
 transact the business of insurance in this state, has had a final order of liquidation entered against it with a finding of insolvency by a court of competent jurisdiction in the issuer’s state of domicile.

(i) “Issuer” includes insurance companies, fraternal benefit societies, and any other entity delivering, or issuing for delivery, Medicare supplement policies or certificates in this state, except entities subject to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 1358.1) of Chapter 2.2 of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(j) “Medi-Cal” means California’s version of Medicaid under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.

(k) “Medicare” means the Health Insurance for the Aged Act, Title XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, as amended.

(l) “Medicare Advantage plan” means a plan of coverage for health benefits under Medicare Part C and includes:

(1) Coordinated care plans that provide health care services, including, but not limited to, health care service plans (with or without a point-of-service option), plans offered by provider-sponsored organizations, and preferred provider organizations plans.

(2) Medical savings account plans coupled with a contribution into a Medicare Advantage medical savings account.

(3) Medicare Advantage private fee-for-service plans.

(m) “Medicare supplement policy” means a group or individual policy of health insurance, other than a policy issued pursuant to a contract under Section 1876 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 1395mm) or an issued policy under a demonstration project specified in Section 1395ss(g)(1) of Title 42 of the United States Code, that is advertised, marketed, or designed primarily as a supplement to reimbursements under Medicare for the hospital, medical, or surgical expenses of persons eligible for Medicare. “Medicare supplement policy” does not include a Medicare Advantage plan established under Medicare Part C, an outpatient prescription drug plan established under Medicare Part D, or a health care prepayment plan that provides benefits pursuant to an agreement under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of Section 1833 of the federal Social Security Act.

(n) “Policy form” means the form on which the policy is issued for delivery by the issuer.

(o) “1990 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan,” “1990 standardized benefit plan,” or “1990 plan” means a
 group or individual policy of Medicare supplement insurance issued on or after July 21, 1992, and with an effective date prior to June 1, 2010, and includes Medicare supplement insurance policies and certificates renewed on or after that date which are not replaced by the issuer at the request of the insured.

(p) “2010 standardized Medicare supplement benefit plan,” “2010 standardized benefit plan,” or “2010 plan” means a group or individual policy of Medicare supplement insurance issued with an effective date on or after June 1, 2010.

(q) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 145.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.5.

A policy or certificate shall not be advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate unless the policy or certificate contains definitions or terms that conform to the requirements of this section.

(a) (1) “Accident,” “accidental injury,” or “accidental means” shall be defined to employ “result” language and shall not include words that establish an accidental means test or use words such as “external, violent, visible wounds” or
 other similar words of description or characterization.

(2) The definition shall not be more restrictive than the following: “injury or injuries for which benefits are provided means accidental bodily injury sustained by the insured person that is the direct result of an accident, independent of disease or bodily infirmity or any other cause, and occurs while insurance coverage is in force.”

(3) The definition may provide that injuries shall not include injuries for which benefits are provided or available under any workers’ compensation, employer’s liability, or similar law, unless prohibited by law.

(b) “Benefit period” or “Medicare benefit period” shall not be defined more restrictively than as defined in the Medicare Program.

(c) “Convalescent
 nursing home,” “extended care facility,” or “skilled nursing facility” shall not be defined more restrictively than as defined in the Medicare Program.

(d) (1) “Health care expenses” means expenses of health maintenance organizations associated with the delivery of health care services, which expenses are analogous to incurred losses of insurers.

(2) “Health care expenses” shall not include any of the following:

(A) Home office and overhead costs.

(B) Advertising costs.

(C) Commissions and other acquisition costs.

(D) Taxes.

(E) Capital
 costs.

(F) Administrative costs.

(G) Claims processing costs.

(e) “Hospital” may be defined in relation to its status, facilities, and available services or to reflect its accreditation by the Joint Commission on Accreditation of Hospitals, but not more restrictively than as defined in the Medicare Program.

(f) “Medicare” shall be defined in the policy and certificate. “Medicare” may be substantially defined as “The Health Insurance for the Aged Act, Title XVIII of the Social Security Amendments of 1965, as amended,” or “Title I, Part I of Public Law 89-97, as enacted by the 89th Congress and popularly known as the Health Insurance for the Aged Act, as amended,” or words of similar import.

(g) “Medicare eligible expenses” shall mean expenses of the kinds covered by Medicare Parts A and B, to the extent recognized as reasonable and medically necessary by Medicare.

(h) “Physician” shall not be defined more restrictively than as defined in the Medicare Program.

(i) (1) “Sickness” shall not be defined more restrictively than as follows: “sickness means illness or disease of an insured person that first manifests itself after the effective date of insurance and while the insurance is in force.”

(2) The definition may be further modified to exclude sicknesses or diseases for which benefits are provided under any workers’ compensation, occupational disease, employer’s liability, or similar law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 206, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.55.

(a) With regard to Medicare supplement policies, all insurers, brokers, agents, and others engaged in the business of insurance owe a policyholder or a prospective policyholder a duty of honesty, and a duty of good faith and fair dealing.

(b) Conduct of an insurer, broker, or agent during the offer and sale of a Medicare supplement policy previous to the purchase is relevant to any action alleging a breach of the duty of honesty, and a duty of good faith and fair dealing set
 forth in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 328, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.6.

(a) Except for permitted preexisting condition clauses as described in Sections 10192.7, 10192.8, and 10192.81, a policy or certificate shall not be advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery as a Medicare supplement policy if the policy or certificate contains limitations or exclusions on coverage that are more restrictive than those of Medicare.

(b) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not use waivers to exclude, limit, or reduce coverage or benefits for
 specifically named or described preexisting diseases or physical conditions.

(c) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate in force shall not contain benefits that duplicate benefits provided by Medicare.

(d) (1) Subject to paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 10192.8, a Medicare supplement policy with benefits for outpatient prescription drugs that was issued prior to January 1, 2006, shall be renewed for current policyholders, at the option of the policyholder, who do not enroll in Medicare Part D.

(2) A Medicare supplement policy with benefits for outpatient prescription drugs shall not be issued on and after January 1, 2006.

(3) On and after January 1, 2006, a Medicare supplement policy with benefits for
 outpatient prescription drugs shall not be renewed after the policyholder enrolls in Medicare Part D unless both of the following conditions exist:

(A) The policy is modified to eliminate outpatient prescription drug coverage for outpatient prescription drug expenses incurred after the effective date of the individual’s coverage under a Medicare Part D plan.

(B) The premium is adjusted to reflect the elimination of outpatient prescription drug coverage at the time of enrollment in Medicare Part D, accounting for any claims paid if applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 10, Sec. 16.   Effective July 2, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.7.

A policy or certificate shall not be advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate prior to January 1, 2001, unless it meets or exceeds requirements applicable pursuant to this code that were in effect prior to that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 706, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

10192.8.

The following standards are applicable to all Medicare supplement policies or certificates advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery on or after January 1, 2001, and with an effective date prior to June 1, 2010. A policy or certificate shall not be advertised, solicited, or issued for delivery as a Medicare supplement policy or certificate unless it complies with these benefit standards.

(a) The following general standards apply to Medicare supplement policies and certificates and are in
 addition to all other requirements of this article:

(1) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not exclude or limit benefits for losses incurred more than six months from the effective date of coverage because it involved a preexisting condition. The policy or certificate shall not define a preexisting condition more restrictively than a condition for which medical advice was given or treatment was recommended by or received from a physician within six months before the effective date of coverage.

(2) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not indemnify against losses resulting from sickness on a different basis than losses resulting from accidents.

(3) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall provide that benefits designed to cover cost-sharing amounts under Medicare will be changed
 automatically to coincide with any changes in the applicable Medicare deductible, copayment, or coinsurance amounts. Premiums may be modified to correspond with those changes.

(4) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall not provide for termination of coverage of a spouse solely because of the occurrence of an event specified for termination of coverage of the insured, other than the nonpayment of premium.

(5) Each Medicare supplement policy shall be guaranteed renewable or noncancelable.

(A) The issuer shall not cancel or nonrenew the policy solely on the ground of health status of the individual.

(B) The issuer shall not cancel or nonrenew the policy for any reason other than nonpayment of premium or misrepresentation which is shown by the
 issuer to be material to the acceptance for coverage. The contestability period for Medicare supplement insurance shall be two years.

(C) If the Medicare supplement policy is terminated by the master policyholder and is not replaced as provided under subparagraph (E), the issuer shall offer certificate holders an individual Medicare supplement policy that, at the option of the certificate holder, either provides for continuation of the benefits contained in the group policy or provides for benefits that otherwise meet the requirements of one of the standardized policies defined in this article.

(D) If an individual is a certificate holder in a group Medicare supplement policy and membership in the group is terminated, the issuer shall either offer the certificate holder the conversion opportunity described in subparagraph (C) or, at the option of the group policyholder, shall
 offer the certificate holder continuation of coverage under the group policy.

(E) (i) If a group Medicare supplement policy is replaced by another group Medicare supplement policy purchased by the same policyholder, the issuer of the replacement policy shall offer coverage to all persons covered under the old group policy on its date of termination. Coverage under the new policy shall not result in any exclusion for preexisting conditions that would have been covered under the group policy being replaced.

(ii) If a Medicare supplement policy or certificate replaces another Medicare supplement policy or certificate that has been in force for six months or more, the replacing issuer shall not impose an exclusion or limitation based on a preexisting condition. If the original coverage has been in force for less than six months, the replacing issuer shall waive
 any time period applicable to preexisting conditions, waiting periods, elimination periods, or probationary periods in the new policy or certificate to the extent the time was spent under the original coverage.

(F) If a Medicare supplement policy eliminates an outpatient prescription drug benefit as a result of requirements imposed by the Medicare Prescription Drug, Improvement, and Modernization Act of 2003 (P.L. 108-173), the policy as modified as a result of that act shall be deemed to satisfy the guaranteed renewal requirements of this paragraph.

(6) Termination of a Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall be without prejudice to any continuous loss that commenced while the policy was in force, but the extension of benefits beyond the period during which the policy was in force may be predicated upon the continuous total disability of the insured, limited to the
 duration of the policy benefit period, if any, or to payment of the maximum benefits. Receipt of Medicare Part D benefits shall not be considered in determining a continuous loss.

(7) (A) (i) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall provide that benefits and premiums under the policy or certificate shall be suspended at the request of the policyholder or certificate holder for the period, not to exceed 24 months, in which the policyholder or certificate holder has applied for and is determined to be entitled to Medi-Cal, but only if the policyholder or certificate holder notifies the issuer of the policy or certificate within 90 days after the date the individual becomes entitled to assistance. Upon receipt of timely notice, the insurer shall return directly to the insured that portion of the premium attributable to the period of Medi-Cal eligibility, subject to adjustment for paid claims. If
 suspension occurs and if the policyholder or certificate holder loses entitlement to Medi-Cal, the policy or certificate shall be automatically reinstituted (effective as of the date of termination of entitlement) as of the termination of entitlement if the policyholder or certificate holder provides notice of loss of entitlement within 90 days after the date of loss and pays the premium attributable to the period, effective as of the date of termination of entitlement, or equivalent coverage shall be provided if the prior form is no longer available.

(ii) A Medicare supplement policy or certificate shall provide that benefits and premiums under the policy or certificate shall be suspended at the request of the policyholder or certificate holder for any period that may be provided by federal regulation if the policyholder is entitled to benefits under Section 226(b) of the Social Security Act and is covered under a group health plan, as defined
 in Section 1862(b)(1)(A)(v) of the Social Security Act. If suspension occurs and the policyholder or certificate holder loses coverage under the group health plan, the policy or certificate shall be automatically reinstituted, effective as of the date of loss of coverage if the policyholder provides notice within 90 days of the date of the loss of coverage.

(B) Reinstitution of coverages:

(i) Shall not provide for any waiting period with respect to treatment of preexisting conditions.

(ii) Shall provide for resumption of coverage that is substantially equivalent to coverage in effect before the date of suspension. If the suspended Medicare supplement policy provided coverage for outpatient prescription drugs, reinstitution of the policy for a Medicare Part D enrollee shall not include coverage for outpatient
 prescription drugs but shall otherwise provide coverage that is substantially equivalent to the coverage in effect before the date of suspension.

(iii) Shall provide for classification of premiums on terms at least as favorable to the policyholder or certificate holder as the premium classification terms that would have applied to the policyholder or certificate holder had the coverage not been suspended.
